Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB875.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 156 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Appropriate documentation" means:
1. The results of a nationally recognized standardized test or its
equivalent as determined by the department;
2. A portfolio of a student's school work from the previous year
demonstrating the student's performance is at the student's grade
level, as determined at the discretion of the public school's principal or
designee; or
3. If the student was enrolled in a public school or a private, parochial,
or church school certified under KRS 156.160 during the preceding
school year, records demonstrating the student's eligibility based on
the student's academic success at that school;
(b) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Education or the agency
designated by the Kentucky Board of Education to manage interscholastic
athletics in the common schools under KRS 156.070; and
(c) "Nonpublic school" means a private, parochial, or church school
regardless of whether the school is certified under KRS 156.160, that is not
already participating in interscholastic athletics as managed by the
department.
(2) A student enrolled in a nonpublic school shall be eligible to participate in
interscholastic athletics sponsored or engaged in by the public school to which
the student would be assigned according to the attendance policies adopted by the
local board of education of the school district in which the student resides. If the
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2524
student leaves the public school, then the student shall be subject to the same
transfer and eligibility rules and bylaws as apply to other students in
interscholastic athletics. Prior to participating in an interscholastic athletic
activity or sport under this subsection, a nonpublic school student shall:
(a) Pay any participation or activity fee that is charged to any other public
school student participating in the interscholastic athletic activity or sport;
(b) Adhere to the same standards of behavior, responsibility, performance, and
code of conduct as other students participating in the interscholastic athletic
activity or sport;
(c) Adhere to the same academic standards as other students participating in
the interscholastic athletic activity or sport, with those standards confirmed
by appropriate documentation provided by the parent or guardian of the
student to the public school at which the nonpublic school student
participates. The parent or guardian shall provide, in accordance with the
policies of the local board of education and school, verification that the
student is meeting any grade requirements that are applicable to other
students participating in the interscholastic athletic activity or sport;
(d) Register with the school district the student's intent to participate in an
interscholastic athletic activity or sport at a district's school before the first
instructional day of the semester during which the activity or sport is
offered; and
(e) Comply with the same physical examination, immunization, insurance, age,
and semester eligibility requirements as other students participating in the
interscholastic athletic activity or sport.
(3) Transportation of a nonpublic school student participating in a public school's
interscholastic athletic activity shall be the responsibility of the parent, guardian,
or student. However, the student may use the same transportation provided by the
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2524
school to other students participating in the interscholastic athletic activity if no
additional expenses are incurred by the school or district.
(4) In selecting members of an interscholastic athletic team, a public school shall not
discriminate against a nonpublic school student who is otherwise eligible to
participate under this section.
(5) Participation in interscholastic athletics is a privilege and not a right, and this
section shall not be interpreted to create a cause of action on behalf of a student
against a school district, a school district official, or the department.
(6) This section shall not be construed to permit the department, a school district, or
a public school to exercise control, regulatory authority, or supervision over a
nonpublic school student or the student's parent or guardian, including with
respect to the student's education program, that is beyond the control, regulatory
authority, or supervision required to participate in interscholastic athletics.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:46 AM Jacketed